Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF690.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1930YH (2) 91 je/js H.F. 690 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 70A.24 Public safety employee and 1 volunteer benefits ââ fund ââ appropriation. 2 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 3 requires: 4 a. âDepartmentâ means the department of management. 5 b. âEmployment benefitâ includes but is not limited to any 6 form of insurance and any pension or other retirement benefit. 7 c. âPublic safety employeeâ means a person employed as a 8 police officer, fire fighter, or an emergency medical care 9 provider as defined in section 147A.1. 10 d. âPublic safety volunteerâ means a person who volunteers 11 for a city or county as a reserve peace officer as defined in 12 section 80D.1A, a volunteer fire fighter as defined in section 13 85.61, or an emergency medical care provider as defined in 14 section 147A.1. 15 2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a 16 person who is employed by a city or county as a public safety 17 employee for at least thirty-two hours per week shall, for 18 such week, be considered a full-time employee of the city or 19 county for purposes of any employment benefit available to the 20 employee from the city or county or from the state. 21 3. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a 22 person who volunteers for a city or county as a public safety 23 volunteer for at least thirty-two hours per week shall, for 24 such week, be granted all employment benefits available from 25 the city or county or from the state to full-time public safety 26 employees employed by the city or county. 27 4. The cost of all employment benefits paid to a public 28 safety employee or public safety volunteer as required by 29 this section that would not have been required but for this 30 section shall be paid by the department from moneys available 31 in the local public safety employment benefit fund created in 32 subsection 6. 33 5. The department shall establish by rule a process and 34 timeline for cities and counties to calculate, document, and 35 -1- LSB 1930YH (2) 91 je/js 1/ 4 H.F. 690 submit to the department the cost of employment benefits for 1 which the department is responsible under this section. Such 2 timeline shall require that cities and counties submit such 3 documentation to the department with sufficient time before 4 payment is due to allow the department to validate the costs 5 and resolve any dispute as to the correct calculation. 6 6. A local public safety employment benefit fund is created 7 in the state treasury under the control of the department 8 and shall consist of moneys appropriated to the fund by the 9 general assembly. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, 10 interest or earnings on moneys deposited in the local public 11 safety employment benefit fund shall be credited to the fund. 12 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in this 13 section that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of 14 the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for 15 expenditure for the purposes designated. 16 7. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 17 to the department for each fiscal year beginning on or after 18 July 1, 2025, an amount necessary to fully pay for the cost of 19 employment benefits as described in subsection 4. 20 8. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 21 to administer this section. 22 Sec. 2. IMPLEMENTATION OF ACT. The funds generated as 23 a result of the enactment of this Act are intended to cover 24 the costs of any state mandate included in this Act and this 25 specification of state funding shall be deemed to meet all the 26 state funding-related requirements of section 25B.2, subsection 27 3, and no additional state funding shall be necessary for the 28 full implementation of this Act by, and enforcement of this Act 29 against, all affected political subdivisions. 30